New York, session 2025-2026, A4322.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 240.31 of the penal law, as 2 amended by chapter 74 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. Sets on fire a cross in public view or displays a swastika, common- 5 ly exhibited as the emblem of Nazi Germany, on a billboard, aerial 6 display or by a similar method for uninvited public viewing; or 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08266-01-5